District of Columbia statutes.
8-151.02

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a single executive agency to protect human health and the environment in accordance with District and federal law and regulation, improve the urban quality of life, streamline the administration of District environmental law and programs, including those relating to environmental health, to improve public notification of environmental issues, and to enable the District to seek primacy.

Feb. 15, 2006, D.C. Law 16-51, § 102, 52 DCR 10812
Delegation and Transfer of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 16-51, the District Department of the Environment Establishment Act of 2005, see Mayor’s Order 2006-61, June 14, 2006 ( 53 DCR 7684).
Amendment of Mayor’s Order 2002-16, dated June 14, 2006, Delegation and Transfer of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 16-51, the District Department of the Environment Establishment Act of 2005, see Mayor’s Order 2006-150, November 6, 2006 ( 53 DCR 9350).
Establishment of Recycling Policy into the District Department of the Environment, see Mayor’s Order 2009-7, January 23, 2009 ( 56 DCR 2022).